Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6545
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Grow the Good Life Act is to provide incentives to encourage large in-state employers to retain workforce and their headquarters in-state, as well as attract or relocate workforce to the state, when there is a material change in ownership or control pursuant to a merger or business combination with a company located outside of this state.

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 2.
April 17, 2026